test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-solleed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - solleed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sollääm
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sollääk
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sollad
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: solleep
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sollveʹted
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sollee 
     solleed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: solleet

     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: solleem
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: solliiǩ
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sollii
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [solliim, solliin]
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: solliid
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sollee
     solleed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: solleeš

     solleed+V+Pot+Sg1: solleʹžem
     solleed+V+Pot+Sg2: solleʹžiǩ
     solleed+V+Pot+Sg3: solleež
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl1: [solleʹžep, solleʹžim, solleʹžin]
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl2: solleʹžid 
     solleed+V+Pot+Pl3: solleʹže
     solleed+V+Pot+Sg4: solleʹžet
     solleed+V+Pot+ConNeg: solleʹže

     solleed+V+Cond+Sg1: solleʹčem
     solleed+V+Cond+Sg2: solleʹčiǩ
     solleed+V+Cond+Sg3: solleʹči
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl1: [solleʹčim, solleʹčin, solleʹčep]
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl2: solleʹčid
     solleed+V+Cond+Pl3: solleʹče
     solleed+V+Cond+Sg4: solleʹčeš
     solleed+V+Cond+ConNeg: solleʹče

     solleed+V+Imprt+Sg2: sollad
     solleed+V+Imprt+Sg3: sollââǥǥas
     solleed+V+Imprt+Pl1: sollâkap
     solleed+V+Imprt+Pl2: solleʹǩed
     solleed+V+Imprt+Pl3: sollâkaz
     solleed+V+Imprt+ConNeg: sollukku

     solleed+V+Actio+Ess: solleʹmen
     solleed+V+Actio: solleem
     solleed+V+Act+PrsPrc: solleei
     solleed+V+Act+PrfPrc: sollääm
     solleed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [sollummu, solluum]
     solleed+V+VAbess: solleǩâni
     solleed+V+Ger+Ess: solleen
     solleed+V+Ger+Instr: solleeʹl
